Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-248
Wills; recording; how, when, and where authorized.

Any will of real estate, which shall have been duly proved in the county court of any county in this state, and any such will, the proof of which shall be contested in that court and carried up by appeal or otherwise and the validity of which shall be finally established, may, with the certificate of proof annexed thereto, be recorded in the office of the register of deeds of the county or counties where the real estate lies, in the same manner and with like effect as in case of deeds.

R.S.1866, c. 43, § 25, p. 285;

Laws 1887, c. 30, § 18, p. 369;

R.S.1913, § 6220;

C.S.1922, § 5619;

C.S.1929, § 76-225;

R.S.1943, § 76-248.

Recording fees, see section 33-109.